Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 25. Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund.

§ 10.1-2500.
Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund established.

There is hereby established the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund, to be used (i) for the purpose of emergency response to environmental pollution incidents and for the development and implementation of corrective actions for pollution incidents, other than pollution incidents addressed through the Virginia Underground Petroleum Storage Tank Fund, as described in § 62.1-44.34:11 of the State Water Control Law; (ii) to conduct assessments of potential sources of toxic contamination in accordance with the policy developed pursuant to § 62.1-44.19:10; and (iii) to assist small businesses for the purposes described in §

10.1-1197.3

.

The Fund shall be a nonlapsing revolving fund consisting of grants, general funds, and other such moneys as appropriated by the General Assembly, and moneys received by the State Treasurer for:

Noncompliance penalties assessed pursuant to §

10.1-1311

, civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection B of §

10.1-1316

, and civil charges assessed pursuant to subsection C of §

10.1-1316

.

Civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection C of §

10.1-1418.1

, civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsections A and E of §

10.1-1455

, and civil charges assessed pursuant to subsection F of §

10.1-1455

.

(Contingent expiration date — see note) Civil charges assessed pursuant to subdivision 8d of § 62.1-44.15 and civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (a) of § 62.1-44.32, excluding assessments made for violations of Article 9 (§ 62.1-44.34:8 et seq.) or 10 (§ 62.1-44.34:10 et seq.), Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1, or a regulation, administrative or judicial order, or term or condition of approval relating to or issued under those articles.

Civil penalties and civil charges assessed pursuant to § 62.1-270.

Civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection A of § 62.1-252 and civil charges assessed pursuant to subsection B of § 62.1-252.

Civil penalties assessed in conjunction with special orders by the Director pursuant to §

10.1-1186

and by the Waste Management Board pursuant to subsection G of § 10.1-1455.

3.

(Contingent effective date — see note)

Civil charges assessed pursuant to subdivision (8d) of § 62.1-44.15 and civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (a) of § 62.1-44.32, excluding assessments made for violations of Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.), 2.4 (§ 62.1-44.15:51 et seq.), 2.5 (§ 62.1-44.15:67 et seq.), 9 (§ 62.1-44.34:8 et seq.), or 10 (§ 62.1-44.34:10 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1, or a regulation, administrative or judicial order, or term or condition of approval relating to or issued under those articles.

History.

1991, c. 718; 1992, c. 812; 1997, cc. 624, 850; 1998, c. 837; 2000, cc. 17, 1043; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 380, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“A. Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 10.1, Chapter 25, Code of Virginia, the department is authorized to expend funds from the balances in the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund for costs associated with its waste management, air, and water programs.

“B. Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 10.1, Chapter 25, Code of Virginia, the department is authorized to expend up to $600,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year from the balances in the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund to further develop and implement eGovernment services.”

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 624 and 850 are identical, and inserted “and to assist small businesses for the purposes described in §

10.1-1197.3

” at the end of subsection A and added subdivision B 6.

The 1998 amendment

added “and by the Waste Management Board pursuant to subsection G of §

10.1-1455

” at the end of subdivision B 6.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 17 and 1043 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the clause (i) and (iii) designations, and inserted clause (ii).

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and in subdivision B 3, substituted “(8d)” for “8d” and inserted “2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.), 2.4 (§ 62.1-44.15:51 et seq.), 2.5 (§ 62.1-44.15:67 et seq.)”; and made minor stylistic changes. For contingent effective date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

§ 10.1-2501.
Administration of the Fund.

All moneys received by the State Treasurer for the civil penalties and civil charges referred to in §

10.1-2500

, and all reimbursements received under §

10.1-2502

shall be and hereby are credited to the Fund.
Interest earned on the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
The Fund shall be established on the books of the State Comptroller.
Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

History.

1991, c. 718; 1992, c. 887.

§ 10.1-2502.
Disbursements from the Fund; transfer of funds to the Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund.

The disbursement of moneys from the Fund shall be made by the State Comptroller at the written request of the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. The Director shall have the authority to access the Fund for up to $100,000 per occurrence as long as the disbursement does not exceed the balance for the agency account. If the Director requests a disbursement in excess of $100,000 or an amount exceeding the remaining agency balance, the disbursement shall require the written approval of the Governor. The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop guidelines which, after approval by the Governor, determine how the Fund can be used for the purposes described herein.

Disbursements from the Fund may be made for the purposes outlined in §

10.1-2500

, including, but not limited to, personnel, administrative, and equipment costs and expenses directly incurred by the above-mentioned agencies or by any other agency or political subdivision, acting at the direction of one of the above-mentioned agencies, in and for preventing or alleviating damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by environmental pollution incidents.

The agency shall promptly seek reimbursement from any person causing or contributing to an environmental pollution incident for all sums disbursed from the Fund for the protection, relief and recovery from loss or damage caused by such person. In the event a request for reimbursement is not paid within sixty days of receipt of a written demand, the claim shall be referred to the Attorney General for collection. The agency shall be allowed to recover all legal and court costs and other expenses incident to such actions for collection.

In any year in which the Fund balance exceeds two million dollars, the Director may transfer such excess amount to the Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-1197.2

.

History.

1991, c. 718; 1992, c. 887; 1997, cc. 624, 850.

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 624 and 850 are identical, and added the last paragraph.

§ 10.1-2503.
Virginia Offshore Energy Emergency Response Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Offshore Energy Emergency Response Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund,” which shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All amounts designated for deposit to the Fund from revenues and royalties paid to the Commonwealth as a result of offshore natural gas and oil drilling or exploration shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request of the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes stated in subsection B.

The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall use moneys in the Fund solely for the purposes of emergency preparation, emergency response, emergency environmental protection, or mitigation associated with a release of liquid hydrocarbons or associated fluids directly related to offshore energy exploration, development, production, or transmission.

The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall have the authority to access the Fund for up to $500,000 per occurrence as long as the disbursement does not exceed the balance for the agency account. If the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality requests a disbursement in excess of $500,000 or an amount exceeding the remaining agency balance, the disbursement shall require the written approval of the Governor. The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop guidelines that, after approval by the Governor, determine how the Fund can be used for the purposes described herein.

Disbursements from the Fund may be made for the purposes outlined in subsection B, including personnel, administrative, and equipment costs and expenses directly incurred by the Department of Environmental Quality or by any other agency or political subdivision, acting at the direction of the Department of Environmental Quality, in and for preventing or alleviating damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by a release of liquid hydrocarbons or associated fluids directly related to offshore energy exploration, development, production, or transmission.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall promptly seek reimbursement from any person causing or contributing to such a release of liquid hydrocarbons or associated fluids for all sums disbursed from the Fund for protection, relief, or recovery from loss or damage caused by such person. In the event a request for reimbursement is not paid within 60 days of receipt of a written demand, the claim shall be referred to the Attorney General for collection. The agency shall be allowed to recover all legal and court costs and other expenses incident to such actions for collection.

History.

2014, c. 293.